Wisconsin, session 2025, AB469.
do enact as follows:AB469,13Section 1. 108.02 (26m) of the statutes is repealed.AB469,24Section 2. 108.04 (3) of the statutes is repealed.AB469,35Section 3. 108.04 (11) (bm) of the statutes is amended to read:AB469,2,86108.04 (11) (bm) The department shall apply any ineligibility under par. (be) 1against benefits and weeks of eligibility for which the claimant would otherwise be 2eligible after the week of concealment and within 6 years after the date of an initial 3determination issued under s. 108.09 finding that a concealment occurred. The 4claimant shall not receive waiting period credit under sub. (3) for the period of 5ineligibility applied under par. (be). If no benefit rate applies to the week for which 6the claim is made, the department shall use the claimant’s benefit rate for the 7claimant’s next benefit year beginning after the week of concealment to determine 8the amount of the benefit reduction.AB469,49Section 4. Initial applicability.AB469,2,1110(1) This act first applies to benefit years beginning on the effective date of this 11subsection.AB469,512Section 5. Effective date.AB469,2,1313(1) This act takes effect on the Sunday after publication.AB469,2,1414